Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1628
Agent's permit; denial; notice; reasons.

If the commissioner denies an application for an agent's permit, he or she shall notify the school which the agent represented or proposed to represent, according to the records of the department, including the reasons for denial.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 28;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 28;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2828;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 28.